Utah statutes.
31A-25-210.   License lapse and voluntary surrender.

(1) (a)  A license issued under this chapter shall lapse if the licensee fails to:

(i)  pay when due a fee under Section 31A-3-103;

(ii)  submit a completed renewal application as required by Section 31A-25-202;

(iii)  produce, when due, evidence of compliance with the financial responsibility requirement under Section 31A-25-205; or

(iv)  maintain an active license in a resident state if the licensee is a nonresident licensee.

(b) (i)  A licensee whose license lapses due to the following may request an action described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii):

(A)  military service;

(B)  voluntary service for a period of time designated by the person for whom the licensee provides voluntary service; or

(C)  some other extenuating circumstances, such as long-term medical disability.

(ii)  A licensee described in Subsection (1)(b)(i) may request:

(A)  reinstatement of the license no later than one year from the day on which the license lapses; and

(B)  waiver of any of the following imposed for failure to comply with renewal procedures:

(I)  an examination requirement;

(II)  reinstatement fees set under Section 31A-3-103; or

(III)  other sanction imposed for failure to comply with renewal procedures.

(2)  If a license issued under this chapter is voluntarily surrendered, the license may be reinstated:

(a)  during the license period in which the license is voluntarily surrendered; and

(b)  no later than one year after the day on which the license is voluntarily surrendered.

